District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

42-307

Perpetuities; pensions and employee trusts excepted.

Repealed.

Aug. 25, 1959, 73 Stat. 428, Pub. L. 86-201, § 1
Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-292, § 403, 48 DCR 2087
1981 Ed., § 45-307.
1973 Ed., § 45-107.